zh-TW: 鑰匙齒型類型: 桶式; 凹槽鑰匙; 雙面; 平片/帶齒; 雷射切割; 管形; 其他
it: Tipo di lama della chiave: Barile; Fossetta; Doppi lavandini; Piatta/dentellata; Taglio laser; Tubolare; Altro
de: Schlüsselblatttyp: Fass; Bohrmulden; Doppelseitig; Flach/Bart; Lasergeschnitten; Rohrförmig; Sonstiges
fr: Type de lame de clé: Tonneau; À empreinte; Double face; Plate/taillée; Découpe laser; Tubulaire; Autre
ja: キーブレードのタイプ: バレル; ディンプル; 両面; フラット/ビット付き; レーザーカット; チューブラー; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta oštrice ključa: Bačvasti; Udubljena površina; Dvostrani; Plosnati / s nazubljenim vrhom; Laserski rezano; Cjevasto; Ostalo
nb: Nøkkelbladtype: Tønne; Hakk; Dobbelsidet; Flat/bitt; Laserkuttet; Rørformet; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de lâmina da chave: Barril; Cavada; Dupla face; Plana/dentada; Corte a laser; Tubular; Outro
cs: Typ klíče: Dozické; Důlkový; Oboustranné; Plochý/drážkový; Laserem řezané; Duté; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип перо на ключа: Цилиндрично; С вдлъбнатини; Двустранно; Плоско/назъбено; Отрязано с лазер; Тръбообразно; Друго
sv: Typ av nyckelblad: Tunna; Grop; Dubbelsidig; Platt/bittad; Laserskuren; Rörformig; Övrigt
ko: 열쇠 블레이드 유형: 배럴; 딤플; 양면; 플랫/비트; 레이저 컷; 튜브형; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de lâmina de chave: Barril; Com reentrâncias; Dupla face; Plano/perfurado; Cortado a laser; Com câmara; Outro
sk-SK: Typ čepele kľúča: Valcová; Jamkový; Obojstranná; Plochý/zúbkovaný; Rez laserom; Rúrková; Iné
el: Τύπος λεπίδας κλειδιού: Βαρέλι; Φυλλοειδής; Διπλής όψης; Επίπεδη/δαγκωμένη; Κοπής με λέιζερ; Σωληνοειδής; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta rezila ključa: Odebeljena; Jamčica; Dvostranski; Ploščato/z zobmi; Laserski rez; Cevasta; Druga
th: ประเภทของดอกกุญแจ: ทรงบาร์เรล; ใบกุญแจแบบเจาะจุด; สองด้าน; ใบกุญแจแบบแบน/มีฟันหยัก; ตัดด้วยเลเซอร์; แบบท่อ; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип лезвия ключа: Сувальдный; С коническими углублениями; Двусторонний; Плоский/с бородкой; С лазерной нарезкой; Тубулярный; Другой
lt-LT: Rakto geležtės tipas: Apvalūs; Duobė; Dvipusiai; Plokščias / su įpjova; Pjauti lazeriu; Vamzdiniai; Kita
zh-CN: 钥匙刃口类型: 桶形; 凹点式; 双面; 平刃/齿刃; 激光切割; 管状; 其他
da: Nøglebladstype: Tønde; Forsænking; Dobbeltsidet; Flad eller med bits; Laserskåret; Rørformet; Andet
tr: Anahtar bıçağı tipi: Varil; Çentik; Çift taraflı; Düz / çentikli; Lazer kesim; Tüplü; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul lamei cheii: Butoi; Cu adâncituri; Cu două fețe; Plat/cu zimți; Decupată cu laser; Tubular; Altele
hu: Kulcspenge típusa: Hordó; Bemélyedések; Kétoldalas; Lapos/mart; Lézervágott; Cső alakú; Egyéb
en: Key blade type: Barrel; Dimple; Double-sided; Flat/bitted; Laser cut; Tubular; Other
vi: Loại lưỡi chìa khóa: Thùng; Dạng lúm; Hai mặt; Dẹt/có răng; Cắt bằng laser; Liền săm; Khác
nl: Sleutelbladtype: Vat; Kuiltje; Dubbelzijdig; Platte baardsleutel; Lasergesneden; Buisvormig; Overig
pl: Typ ostrza klucza: Baryłkowe; Z nacięciem; Dwustronne; Płaski / z nacięciem; Laserowo cięte; Rurowe; Pozostałe
es: Tipo de hoja de llave: Barril; Hoyuelo; Doble cara; Plano/con brocas; Impresión láser; Tubular; Otros
fi: Avaimen terän tyyppi: Tynnyri; Kuoppa; Kaksipuolinen; Litteä/uritettu; Laserleikkaus; Putkimainen; Muu